Maryland, session 2025, HB0994.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–213.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “CONSEQUENCES OF A CONVICTION FOR FELONY
MURDER” MEANS THE LEGAL PENALTIES THAT TAKE AWAY AN INDIVIDUAL’S
FREEDOM, RIGHTS, AND ACCESS TO PROGRAMS OR SERVICES AFTER CONVICTION
FOR MURDER IN THE FIRST DEGREE UNDER § 2–201(A)(4) OF THE CRIMINAL LAW
ARTICLE.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO BALTIMORE CITY.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0994*

HOUSE BILL 994
(C) THE BALTIMORE CITY BOARD OF SCHOOL COMMISSIONERS SHALL
DEVELOP AN AGE–APPROPRIATE COURSE ON THE CONSEQUENCES OF A
CONVICTION FOR FELONY MURDER FOR STUDENTS IN GRADES 6 THROUGH 8 IN
BALTIMORE CITY PUBLIC SCHOOLS.
(D) BEGINNING IN THE 2026–2027 SCHOOL YEAR, THE BOARD SHALL
IMPLEMENT THE COURSE ON THE CONSEQUENCES OF A CONVICTION FOR FELONY
MURDER DEVELOPED UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION.
(E) THE CHIEF ACADEMIC OFFICER SHALL ENSURE THAT A COURSE ON
THE CONSEQUENCES OF A CONVICTION FOR FELONY MURDER IS TAUGHT TO
STUDENTS AT LEAST ONCE DURING GRADES 6 THROUGH 8.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.